West Virginia, session 2026, HB5542.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of West Virginia: §21-5G-1. Definitions. [Repealed]. §21-5G-2. Individual's right to refrain from affiliating with a labor organization. [Repealed]. §21-5G-3. Contracting for exclusion from employment because of affiliation or nonaffiliation with a labor organization. [Repealed]. §21-5G-4. Criminal penalty. [Repealed]. §21-5G-5. Civil relief; damages. [Repealed]. §21-5G-6. Exceptions. [Repealed]. §21-5G-7. Applicability; severability. [Repealed].